North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-01 State Board of Public School Education

15.1-01-01.
State board of public school education — Composition.

The state board of public school education consists of the superintendent of public instruction and:

An individual representing Barnes, Cass, Grand Forks, Griggs, Nelson, Steele, and Traill Counties;

An individual representing Benson, Bottineau, Cavalier, McHenry, Pembina, Pierce, Ramsey, Renville, Rolette, Towner, and Walsh Counties;

An individual representing Dickey, Emmons, LaMoure, Logan, McIntosh, Ransom, Richland, and Sargent Counties;

An individual representing Burleigh, Eddy, Foster, Kidder, McLean, Sheridan, Stutsman, and Wells Counties;

An individual representing Burke, Divide, McKenzie, Mountrail, Ward, and Williams Counties; and

An individual representing Adams, Billings, Bowman, Dunn, Golden Valley, Grant, Hettinger, Mercer, Morton, Oliver, Sioux, Slope, and Stark Counties.

All board members other than the superintendent of public instruction must be qualified electors and must reside in one of the counties they represent.

The governor shall appoint new board members from a list of names submitted by a committee consisting of the president of North Dakota united, the president of the North Dakota council of educational leaders, and the president of the North Dakota school boards association. Two of the state board members must be members of the North Dakota school boards association.

Appointees serve for six-year terms, staggered so that the terms of two members expire on June thirtieth of each even-numbered year.

If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint an individual to serve for the duration of the unexpired term.

Each member of the board is entitled to receive, from the biennial appropriation for the superintendent of public instruction, compensation in the amount of sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per day and reimbursement for expenses, as provided by law for state officers, if the member is attending board meetings or performing duties directed by the board. The compensation provided for in this section may not be paid to any member who receives a salary or other compensation as an employee or official of this state if the individual is serving on the board by virtue of the individual’s state office or state employment.

The superintendent of public instruction shall serve as the executive director and secretary of the board. The superintendent shall call meetings as necessary, carry out the policies of the board, and employ personnel necessary to perform the board’s duties.

The board shall annually elect one member to serve as the chairman.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 1; 2013, ch. 151, § 1; 2017, ch. 129, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 151, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

15.1-01-02.
Joint meetings — State board of public school education — State board of higher education — Education standards and practices board — State board for career and technical education.

The state board of public school education, the state board of higher education, the education standards and practices board, and the state board for career and technical education shall meet together at least once each year at the call of the superintendent of public instruction, the commissioner of higher education, the executive director of the education standards and practices board, and the director of career and technical education for the purposes of:

Coordinating elementary and secondary education programs, career and technical education programs, and higher education programs;

Establishing high standards and expectations of students at all levels of the education continuum;

Ensuring that all students have access to challenging curricula;

Ensuring that the individuals instructing students at all levels of the education continuum are highly qualified and capable;

Cooperating in the provision of professional growth and development opportunities for individuals instructing students at all levels of the education continuum; and

Ensuring cooperation in any other jointly beneficial project or program.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 162, § 47; 1999, ch. 196, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 47; 2009, ch. 31, § 38.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 38 of chapter 31, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2003 amendment of this section by section 47 of chapter 138, S.L. 2003 became effective August 1, 2003.

15.1-01-03.
State board of public school education — Powers and duties.

The state board of public school education shall:

Assist county committees in carrying out their duties.

Provide county committees with clerical assistance, plans of procedure, standards, data, maps, forms, and other materials, information, and services.

Appoint members to the county committee, if the county superintendent does not fulfill this duty, as provided for in section 15.1-10-01.

Provide oversight for regional education associations as required by chapter 15.1-09.1.

Establish and certify a North Dakota learning continuum to allow a district-approved, mastery framework policy to award units required under sections 15.1-21-01 and 15.1-21-02 and to waive unit instructional time requirements under section 15.1-21-03, upon the recommendation of the kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council.

The state board of public school education may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 1; 2001, ch. 172, § 1; 2017, ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 136, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-01-04.
Kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council.

The state board of public school education shall oversee the creation and ongoing operation of the kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council.

The council consists of:

Three members of the legislative assembly, one member of the majority party from each chamber of the legislative assembly, selected by the respective majority leader of the chamber, and one member of the minority party selected through collaboration between the respective minority leaders of each chamber;

The governor or the governor’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent’s designee;

The president of the state board for career and technical education or the president’s designee;

The president of the board of the North Dakota council of educational leaders or the president’s designee;

The president of the board of North Dakota united or the president’s designee;

The president of the board of the North Dakota school boards association or the president’s designee;

The president of the board of the North Dakota small organized schools or the president’s designee;

The president of the board of the North Dakota school counselor association or the president’s designee; and

The following gubernatorial appointees:

An individual representing the statewide longitudinal data system committee;

An individual representing a tribal school;

An individual employed as a public school administrator;

An individual employed as a public school principal;

An individual employed as a public school teacher;

A director of a special education unit; and

A director of a regional education association.

The term of office for a member appointed by the governor is four years. The governor may stagger the initial appointments to the council so no more than three members’ terms expire in any year.

The council shall select a presiding officer annually from among its members.

A member of the council who is a member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive per diem compensation at the rate provided under section 54-35-10 for each day performing official duties of the council and to reimbursement for travel and expenses as provided by law, to be paid by the legislative council. A member of the council who is not a state employee is entitled to receive as compensation sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per day and to reimbursement of expenses as provided by law for state officers while attending meetings of the council, to be paid by the state board of public school education. A state employee who is a member of the council is entitled to receive that employee’s regular salary and is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses, to be paid by the employing agency.

The council may hire an executive director.

The council shall:

Assist in the implementation, dissemination, and communication of the statewide strategic vision and evaluate progress toward meeting the identified goals and strategies.

Perform a continuous review of the effectiveness and efficiency of access and delivery of education services and programs in the state.

Identify opportunities for increased collaboration among state education entities and stakeholders.

Identify gaps or duplications in education services and programs and provide recommendations for addressing those gaps or duplications.

Study and evaluate new and emerging educational initiatives and trends and provide recommendations for policy changes to state entities or the legislative assembly if necessary.

Support the implementation, dissemination, and communication of local or regional educational initiatives and practices, including innovative education programs, on a statewide level.

Establish a one-stop communication and information hub to provide the public and interested parties with seamless access to state entities that deliver education services and programs.

Develop and utilize subcommittees as needed.

Seek advice and input from interested parties not appointed to the council as needed.

Review the North Dakota learning continuum and provide recommendations to the state board of public school education.

The council shall meet at least four times per calendar year.

The council shall prepare and present an annual report of council activities to the state board of public school education and to the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 144, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 136, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.